src/import/nouns.lexc
taluliit+N:talu#l´iit%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
talumaa+N:talu#m´aa%>%{id%} PUU ;
talumaja+N:talu#maja%>%{pl.u%}%{stemill%} KAVA ;
talumajand+N:talu#majand REDEL ;
talumajapidamine+N:talu#maja#pidamine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@talumatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@talumatus SUULINE ;
talumees+N:talu#me MEES ;
talunaine+N:talu#naine NAINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@talund+N:@P.NomStem.First@talund REDEL ;
talunik+N:t`alun´ik ELANIK ;
taluomanik+N:talu#`oman´ik ELANIK ;
talupere+N:talu#pere%{stemill%} PERE ;
taluperemees+N:talu#pere#me MEES ;
taluperepäev+N:talu#pere#p´äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
talupidaja+N:talu#pidaja AASTA ;
talupidamine+N:talu#pidamine OLULINE ;
talupoeg+N:talu#p´oE4G1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
talupoegkond+N:talu#p´oegk´onnD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
talupoja-seisus+N:talu#poja-s´eisus SUULINE ;
talupäev+N:talu#p´äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
talurahvamuuseum+N:talu#r´ahva#m´uuseum MUUSEUM ;
talurahvas+N:talu#r´ahva KOTKAS ;
talutaja+N:talutaja AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@talutavus+N:@P.NomStem.First@talutavus SUULINE ;
taluturg+N:talu#t´urG1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@talutus+N:@P.NomStem.First@talutus OLULINE ;
talutöö+N:talu#t´öö%>%{id%} PUU ;
@P.NomStem.First@taluvus+N:@P.NomStem.First@taluvus SUULINE ;
taluõu+N:talu#´õu EIT ;
talv+N:t´al, TALV ;
talveaed+N:talve#´a AED ;
@P.NomStem.First@talvekindlus+N:@P.NomStem.First@talve#k´indlus SUULINE ;
talvekuu+N:talve#k´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
talvekülm+N:talve#k´ülm%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
talvepuu+N:talve#p´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
talvepäev+N:talve#p´äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
talvetaat+N:talve#t´aat, TAUD ;
talveuni+N:talve#un,%{stemill%} MERI ;
talveõhtu+N:talve#´õhtu AASTA ;
talveöö+N:talve#´ööH3Y3%>%{id%}%{stemill%}%{rare%} PUU ;
@P.NomStem.First@talvik+N:@P.NomStem.First@tal,vik VIRSIK ;
talvike+N:tal,vike PEENIKE ;
talvisted+N:talviste AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@talvitus+N:@P.NomStem.First@tal,vitus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@talõšš+N:@P.NomStem.First@tal´õšš TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@tamarind+N:@P.NomStem.First@tamar´ind TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@tamarisk+N:@P.NomStem.First@tamar´isk TAUD ;
tambits+N:tambits MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@tambur+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´ambur REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@tamburiin+N:@P.NomStem.First@t`ambur´iin TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@tambuur+N:@P.NomStem.First@tamb´uur TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@tamiil+N:@P.NomStem.First@tam´iil TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@tamil+N:@P.NomStem.First@tamil REDEL ;
tamka+N:tamka PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@tamm+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´amm TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@tamm+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´amm%>%{pl.i%} EIT ;
tammeleht+N:tamme#l´ehT1%>%{pl.i%} EIT ;
tammemets+N:tamme#m´ets%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
tammepuu+N:tamme#p´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
tammesalu+N:tamme#salu%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@tammik+N:@P.NomStem.First@tammik VIRSIK ;
@R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@tammipealne+N:@R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@tammi#p´ealne SOOLANE ;
@P.NomStem.First@tammistus+N:@P.NomStem.First@tammistus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@tamp+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´amp TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@tampoon+N:@P.NomStem.First@tamp´oon TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@tamtamm+N:@P.NomStem.First@tamt´amm TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@tandem+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´andem REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@tander+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´andE2r REDEL ;
tandža+N:tandža PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@tangens+N:@P.NomStem.First@tangens REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@tangid+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´ang TAUD ;
tango+N:tango PERE ;
tangud+N:t´ang%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
tangupuder+N:tangu#p´uT2E2r%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@tanguut+N:@P.NomStem.First@tang´uut TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@tank+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´ank FIAT ;
@P.NomStem.First@tanker+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´anker REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@tankett+N:@P.NomStem.First@tank´et,t TAUD ;
tankimisjaam+N:t´ankimis#j´aam%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@tankist+N:@P.NomStem.First@tank´ist TAUD ;
tankitõrje+N:tanki#t´õrje PINGE ;
tankitõrjepüss+N:tanki#t´õrje#p´üs,s TAUD ;
tankla+N:t´ankla AASTA ;
tanksaabas+N:t´ank#s´aaP2a KOTKAS ;
tanner+N:tannD1E2r MANNER ;
@P.NomStem.First@tanniin+N:@P.NomStem.First@tann´iin TAUD ;
tanta+N:tanta PERE ;
tante+N:tante PERE ;
tantsija+N:t´an,tsija AASTA ;
tantsijanna+N:t´an,tsijanna PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@tantsijatar+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´an,tsijatar TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@tantsisklus+N:@P.NomStem.First@tan,tsisklus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@tantsitus+N:@P.NomStem.First@tan,tsitus OLULINE ;
tantstõbi+N:t´ants#tõB2%{stemill%} NIMI ;
@P.NomStem.First@tantsuetendus+N:@P.NomStem.First@tantsu#etendus OLULINE ;
tantsumees+N:tantsu#me MEES ;
tantsumuusika+N:tantsu#muusika AASTA ;
tantsunumber+N:tantsu#n´umbE2r REDEL ;
tantsupidu+N:tantsu#piD1u KAVA ;
tantsupoiss+N:tantsu#p´oiss POISS ;
tantsupõrand+N:tantsu#põrand MAGUS ;
tantsusaal+N:tantsu#s´aal, TAUD ;
tantsusamm+N:tantsu#s´amm%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
tantsustiil+N:tantsu#st´iil TAUD ;
tantsutrall+N:tantsu#tr´al,l TAUD ;
tantsutrupp+N:tantsu#tr´upp TAUD ;
tantsuõhtu+N:tantsu#´õhtu AASTA ;
tantsuõpetaja+N:tantsu#õpetaja AASTA ;
tanu+N:tanu KAVA ;
tanulane+N:tanulane OLULINE ;
tanum+N:tanum MAGUS ;
taoism+N:tao´ism TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@taolisus+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´aolisus OLULINE ;
taosed+N:t´aos SOOLANE ;
taotleja+N:t´aotleja AASTA ;
taotlemine+N:t´aotlemine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@taotlus+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´aotlus SUULINE ;
tapalane+N:tapalane OLULINE ;
tapalanna+N:tapalanna PERE ;
tapamaja+N:tapa#maja%>%{pl.u%}%{stemill%} KAVA ;
tapariist+N:tapa#r´iist%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
tapatalgud+N:tapa#t´algu AASTA ;
tapatöö+N:tapa#t´öö%>%{id%} PUU ;
tape+N:t´apP1e PINGE ;
@P.NomStem.First@tapeet+N:@P.NomStem.First@tap´eet, TAUD ;
tapetu+N:tapetu AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@tapiir+N:@P.NomStem.First@tap´iir TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@tapiokk+N:@P.NomStem.First@tapi´okk TAUD ;
tapivangla+N:tapi#v´angla AASTA ;
tapja+N:t´apja AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@taplus+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´aplus SUULINE ;
tapmine+N:t´apmine OLULINE ;
tapmiskatse+N:t´apmis#k´atse PINGE ;
tapmiskoht+N:t´apmis#k´ohT1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@tapp+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´app TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@tapp+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´app%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@tapp+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´app%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@tapper+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´appE2r REDEL ;
tara+N:tara KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@taraan+N:@P.NomStem.First@tar´aan TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@tarakan+N:@P.NomStem.First@tarakan TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@tarand+N:@P.NomStem.First@tarand REDEL ;
tarandik+N:t`arand´ik ELANIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@tarang+N:@P.NomStem.First@tarang VIRSIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@tarantass+N:@P.NomStem.First@t`arant´ass TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@tarantel+N:@P.NomStem.First@tar´antE2l REDEL ;
tarantella+N:tarant`ella PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@tarastus+N:@P.NomStem.First@tarastus OLULINE ;
tarbeese+N:t´arbe#ese HAARE ;
tarbekunst+N:t´arbe#k´un,st TAUD ;
tarbekunstnik+N:t´arbe#k´un,stn´ik ÄMBLIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@tarbetus+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´arbetus OLULINE ;
tarbija+N:t´arbija AASTA ;
tarbijahind+N:t´arbija#h´innD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
tarbijakaitse+N:t´arbija#k´aitse PINGE ;
tarbijakaitseamet+N:t´arbija#k´aitse#amet REDEL ;
tarbijakaitseliit+N:t´arbija#k´aitse#l´iit%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@tarbijakaitseseadus+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´arbija#k´aitse#s´eadus SUULINE ;
tarbijakaitsja+N:t´arbija#k´aitsja AASTA ;
tarbijaskond+N:t´arbijask´onnD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
tarbijaskooperatiiv+N:t´arbijas#kooperat´iiv TAUD ;
tarbijaühiskond+N:t´arbija#`ühisk´onnD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
tarbimine+N:t´arbimine OLULINE ;
tarbimistase+N:t´arbimis#tase HAARE ;
@P.NomStem.First@tarbimus+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´arbimus OLULINE ;
tardaine+N:t´ard#´aine PINGE ;
tardkivim+N:t´ard#kivim REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@tardumus+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´ardumus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@tarduvus+N:@P.NomStem.First@t´arduvus OLULINE ;
tare+N:tare%{stemill%} PERE ;
targutaja+N:targutaja AASTA ;
targutamine+N:targutamine OLULINE ;
targutlemine+N:targutlemine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@targutlus+N:@P.NomStem.First@targutlus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@targutus+N:@P.NomStem.First@targutus OLULINE ;
tari+N:t´arJ1%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
